Wyoming, session 2026, SF0049.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-4-201(a)(vi)(A), 16-4-202(a) and
(c)(ii) through (iv), 16-4-203(f)(intro) and (ii) by
SF0049

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0051
creating a new subparagraph (D), 16-4-204(e) and 16-4-205
are amended to read:

16-4-201. Definitions; short title; designation of
ombudsman.

(a) As used in this act:

(vi) Public records shall be classified as
follows:

(A) "Official public records" includes all
original vouchers, receipts and other documents necessary
to isolate and prove the validity of every transaction
relating to the receipt, use and disposition of all public
property and public income from all sources whatsoever; all
agreements and contracts to which a governmental entity is
a party; all fidelity, surety and performance bonds; all
claims filed against a governmental entity; plea agreements
and nonconfidential portions of sentencing memoranda; all
records or documents required by law to be filed with or
kept by a governmental entity of Wyoming; and all other
SF0049

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0051
documents or records determined by the records committee to
be official public records;

16-4-202. Right of inspection; rules and regulations;
unavailability; training.

(a) All public records shall be open for inspection
by any person at reasonable times, during business hours of
the governmental entity, except as provided in this act or
as otherwise provided by law, but the governmental entity
may make rules and regulations with reference to the
inspection of the records as is reasonably necessary for
the protection of the records and the prevention of
unnecessary interference with the regular discharge of the
duties of the governmental entity. All applications for
public records shall be made to the designated public
records person. The governmental entity shall acknowledge
receipt of a request to the person making the request not
later than three (3) business days after receipt of the
request.

SF0049

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0051
(c) If the public records requested are in the
custody and control of the governmental entity to whom
application is made, the following shall apply:

(ii) If a public record is readily available, it
shall be released immediately to the applicant when the
request is acknowledged so long as the release does not
impair or impede the governmental entity's ability to
discharge its other duties;

(iii) All public records shall be released not
later than thirty (30) ten (10) calendar days from the date
of acknowledged receipt of the request unless good cause
exists preventing release the government entity requests an
extension from the ombudsman as authorized by paragraph
(iv) of this subsection;

(iv) Upon request by a government entity, the
ombudsman may authorize an extension to release public
records if good cause exists preventing release within the
time period specified in paragraph (ii) or (iii) of this
subsection., The public records shall be released on a date
specified by the ombudsman, which shall not exceed an
SF0049

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0051
additional thirty (30) calendar days, or another specified
date if mutually agreed to by the applicant and the
governmental entity;. If a release date cannot be agreed
upon, the applicant may file a complaint with the ombudsman
as provided by paragraph (v) of this subsection;

16-4-203. Right of inspection; grounds for denial;
access of news media; order permitting or restricting
disclosure; exceptions.

(f) Any person aggrieved by the failure of a
governmental entity to release records on the specified
date mutually agreed upon determined pursuant to W.S.
16-4-202(c)(iv) or by the failure of a governmental entity
to comply with an order of the ombudsman pursuant to W.S.
16-4-202(c)(v) may:

(ii) File a complaint with the ombudsman who
may:

(D) Refer the matter to the attorney
general or district attorney, who may apply to the Wyoming
district court to enforce compliance.
SF0049

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0051

16-4-204. Right of inspection; copies, printouts or
photographs; fees.

(e) The department of administration and information
shall adopt uniform rules for the use of state agencies
establishing procedures, fees, costs and charges for
inspection, copies and production of public records under
W.S. 16-4-202(d)(i), 16-4-203(h)(i) and 16-4-204. Any
governmental entity that is not a state agency shall use
the uniform fees, costs and charges for inspection, copies
and production of public records established by the
department of administration and information under this
subsection unless:

(i) The governmental entity charges lower fees,
costs and charges; or

(ii) Upon request to the ombudsman for approval
to charge higher fees, costs or charges, the ombudsman
approves the request for good cause.

16-4-205. Penalties; remedies.
SF0049

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0051

Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates the
provisions of this act is liable for a penalty not to
exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) two thousand
dollars ($2,000.00). The penalty may be recovered in a
civil action and damages may be assessed by the court. The
court may award the prevailing applicant reasonable
attorney fees.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0049